Utah statutes.
58-55-402.   Investigation of regulated activity.
(1)  The division shall be responsible for the investigation of persons and
activities in violation of the provisions of this chapter.
(2)  Investigation by the division shall include investigations of:
(a)  licensees engaged in unlawful or unprofessional conduct; and
(b)  unlicensed persons engaged in the conduct of activity or work regulated
under this chapter and for which a license is required.
(3)  The division shall decline to proceed with investigation of the violation
of any provisions of this chapter if the division finds there is no apparent
material jeopardy to the public health, safety, and welfare.
(4)  The division shall have no responsibility for the inspection of
construction work performed in the state to determine compliance with
applicable codes, or industry and workmanship standards, except as provided in
Subsections  58-1-501(2)(g), 58-55-502(2), (3), and (4), and 58-55-501(16).
(5)  Authorized representatives of the division shall be permitted to enter
upon the premises or site of work regulated under this chapter for the purpose
of determining compliance with the provisions of this chapter.
